Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-8-115 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A group home, as defined in Section 1-1-105 of this title,
shall maintain general liability insurance coverage of at least One
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for each occurrence of damage
to off-site personal property. An insurance policy or contract
required under this section shall cover damage to off-site personal

ENGR. H. B. NO. 3448 Page 1

prop erty that occurs while the child is in the care of the group
home.
B. The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules
providing for a standard form to be signed and dated by an insurance
agent licensed in this state confirming that the group home has an
unexpired and uncancelled insurance policy or contract of at least
One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) that meets the
requirements of this section. This form shall be completed annually
and shall be maintained by the group home.
C. The insurance policy or contract shall be maintained at all
times in an amount as required by this section.
D. The Department shall promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section.
E. The prevailing party in a civil action for damage to off-
site personal property that occurs while the child is in the care of
the group home shall be entitled to attorney fees and costs.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-11-101 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A group home, as defined in Section 2-1-103 of this title,
shall maintain general liability insurance coverage of at least One
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for each occurrence of damage
to off-site personal property. An insurance policy or contract
required under this section shall cover damage to off-site personal
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3448 Page 2

prop erty that occurs while the child is in the care of the group
home.
B. The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules
providing for a standard form to be signed and dated by an insurance
agent licensed in this state confirming that the group home has an
unexpired and uncancelled insurance policy or contract of at least
One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) that meets the
requirements of this section. This form shall be completed annually
and shall be maintained by the group home.
C. The insurance policy or contract shall be maintained at all
times in an amount as required by this section.
D. The Department shall promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section.
E. The prevailing party in a civil action for damage to off-
site personal property that occurs while the child is in the care of
the group home shall be entitled to attorney fees and costs.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 3448 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 3448 Page 4